West Virginia, session 2025, HB2527.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. FEES AND OTHER MONEY COLLECTED AT STATE INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION. §18B-10-7e. Tuition reimbursement for Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation employees. (a) Tuition reimbursement. – The state shall award a tuition reimbursement for undergraduate courses at state institutions of higher education for any student who is employed by the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation in this state. The corrections employee must provide proof of their employment to be eligible for such tuition reimbursement.(b) To be eligible for a reimbursement award, a student must first: (1) Apply to and be accepted at the institution; and (2) apply for other student financial assistance, other than student loans, in compliance with federal financial aid rules, including the federal Pell grant.(c) Reimbursement renewal is contingent upon the student continuing to meet the academic progress standards established by the institution, and upon continued employment with the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(d) The tuition reimbursement provided by this section for each eligible student may be used for undergraduate study. (e) The tuition reimbursement may only be used after other sources of financial aid that are dedicated solely to tuition and fees are exhausted.(f) The state, in coordination with institutions of higher education in this state, may establish any limitations on the provisions of this section as it considers proper.(g) Amount of reimbursement. – The reimbursement amount shall be 20 percent of the total cost of the undergraduate study per year, to be paid in full at 100 percent after five years of work with the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation.